Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Subchapter 5. Bridges, Tracks, Stations, and Equipment

§ 3670.
Clearance standards; variance.

No person shall construct, alter, or permit construction or alteration of a railroad track, railroad bridge, or structure over or adjacent to any railroad track unless the clearances provided equal or exceed the minimum standards set forth in the American Railway Engineering Association’s Manual for Railway Engineering, as in effect at the time work begins.

Subject to the approval of the Transportation Board, a variance from the standards established by this section may be established by written agreement of the Agency of Transportation, all involved railroad companies and any affected municipality.

If the parties are unable to agree on a variance request, the Transportation Board, after notice and hearing, may grant a variance from the standards established by this section if the Board determines that:

the Agency of Transportation, all involved railroad companies, and any affected municipality have had an opportunity to review and comment on the variance request;

granting the variance will not significantly impair the safe, efficient, continuous movement of freight, passengers, and railroad equipment on the State’s railroad system or the safe, efficient performance of railroad maintenance operations; and

the costs and impacts associated with meeting the clearance standards established by this section would exceed any public benefits reasonably likely to flow from adhering to such standards.

Notwithstanding this section, tracks, bridges, and structures lawfully in existence or already under construction before July 1, 1990 may continue to be used and repaired, provided that clearances are not further reduced.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 27; amended

1993, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 62;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 3671.
Destruction of weeds and thistles.

A person or corporation operating a railroad in this State shall cause all thistles and noxious weeds growing within the surveyed boundaries of such railroad to be cut and destroyed before August 1 in each year.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 97

, § 1.

§ 3672.
Repealed. 2017, No. 158 (Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 3673.
Vegetation control.

A railroad shall take reasonable measures to control vegetation that is both on railroad property and on or immediately adjacent to the roadbed, so that the vegetation does not obstruct a highway user’s view of traffic control devices at a grade crossing or of a train approaching the crossing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 97

, § 4;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.

§ 3674.
Enforcement.

If a railroad fails to control vegetation as required by section 3671 or 3673 of this title within 30 days after written notice is given by the selectboard of the town in which the vegetation is located or by the Agency in the case of violations involving a State highway grade crossing, the Transportation Board, upon application by the town or the Agency and after notice and hearing, may order the railroad to perform the work. Any such order shall specify a date by which the work must be completed. If the railroad fails to comply with the Board’s order, the Board may impose a civil penalty of $100.00 against the railroad for each day that the railroad fails to comply with the Board’s order.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 97

, § 3;

2017, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.